src/punct-lex.txt
!****************************************************************************
! Abbreviations
!
!  E. Uí Dhonnchadha
! 
! May 2004 : +Quo instead of +St & +End for quotation marks
!****************************************************************************

Multichar_Symbols

+Punct		! Abbreviation
+Int		! sentence internal
+Fin		! sentence final
+Brack		! round, square and curly brackets
+St		! start bracket, quote etc
+End		! end bracket, quote etc
+Q		! question mark ?
+Bar		! hyphen, underscore, dash etc.
+Quo		! all quotation marks double, single etc.
+Conj +Coord	! & 
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Root
	Punctuation;

LEXICON Punctuation
%.	Final;
<%!>	Final;
%.%.%.	Final;
%.%.	Final;
%?	FinalQ;

%"	Quote;
%"	Quote;
%`	Quote;
%'%'	Quote;
%'	Quote;
%'	Quote;
%'%'	Quote;
%&quot%; Quote;

%,	Internal;
%;	Internal;
%:	Internal;

%-	Bar;
%-%-	Bar;
%_	Punct;
%/	Punct;

%(	Br_Start;
%)	Br_End;
%)%.+Punct+Brack+Fin:%)%.	#;	! added 24/07/08
%[	Br_Start;
%]	Br_End;
%{	Br_Start;
%}	Br_End;
%&lt%;	Br_Start;
%&gt%;	Br_End;

agus+Conj+Coord:%&	#;
agus+Conj+Coord:%&amp%;	#;

LEXICON Punct 
+Punct:		#;


LEXICON Final 
+Punct+Fin:		#;

LEXICON FinalQ 
+Punct+Fin+Q:		#;

LEXICON Internal 
+Punct+Int:		#;

LEXICON Br_Start 
+Punct+Brack+St:	#;

LEXICON Br_End 
+Punct+Brack+End:	#;

LEXICON Quote 
+Punct+Quo:		#;

LEXICON Bar 
+Punct+Bar:		#;
